District of Columbia statutes.
31-1345

Reopening liquidation.

After the liquidation proceeding has been terminated and the liquidator discharged, the Commissioner or other interested party may at any time petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to reopen the proceedings for good cause, including the discovery of additional assets. If the court is satisfied that there is justification for reopening, it shall so order.

History

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 46, 40 DCR 5773
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(z)(2), 44 DCR 1730

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-1343.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2845.